Massachusetts, session 194th, S2376.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission to study and provide recommendations on improving the efficiency and
reducing the timeline for Massachusetts Department of Transportation projects. The commission
shall examine the current project planning, design, permitting, procurement, and construction
processes to identify inefficiencies and recommend best practices for streamlining project
delivery. The study shall include but not be limited to: (1) Reviewing MassDOT’s internal
project management procedures; (2) Evaluating the permitting and approval processes across
state and local agencies; (3) Identifying regulatory or statutory barriers that contribute to project
delays; (4) Assessing the impact of project labor agreements and contractor procurement
methods on project timelines; (5) Comparing MassDOT project timelines with transportation
departments in other states with faster project delivery; (6) Exploring opportunities for public-
of 2

private partnerships to accelerate project completion; (7) Recommending policy reforms or
statutory changes to improve project efficiency.
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of the Secretary of Transportation or their
designee, who shall serve as chair; the Administrator of MassDOT Highway Division or their
designee; the State Auditor or their designee; the Attorney General or their designee; the House
Chair of the Joint Committee on Transportation or their designee; the Senate Chair of the Joint
Committee on Transportation or their designee; the House Minority Leader or a designee; the
Senate Minority Leader or a designee; one representative from the Massachusetts Municipal
Association; one representative from the Associated General Contractors of Massachusetts; and
two public members with expertise in transportation infrastructure, construction management, or
project delivery, appointed by the Governor.
The commission shall hold not fewer than four public hearings across different regions of
the Commonwealth to gather input from municipal leaders, industry professionals, and the
public.
SECTION 3. The commission shall submit its findings, along with any legislative or
regulatory recommendations, to the Governor, the Clerk of the House of Representatives, the
Clerk of the Senate, the Joint Committee on Transportation, and the House and Senate
Committees on Ways and Means no later than 12 months after the passage of this act.
of 2